Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-1002
Certifications; filing.

Certification of notices of liens, certificates, or other notices affecting federal liens by the Secretary of the Treasury of the United States or his or her delegate or by any official or entity of the United States responsible for filing or certifying notice of any other lien shall entitle them to be filed, and no other attestation, certification, or acknowledgment shall be necessary.

Laws 1969, c. 433, § 2, p. 1457;

Laws 1988, LB 933, § 4.